Hawaii statutes.
[§198D-7.6] Limitation on liability.
The State shall not be liable for any injury to any person arising from the
person's use of unimproved lands owned or controlled by the State and regulated
under section 198D-6, unless the injury results from gross negligence on the
part of the State. [L 1999, c 106, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next